Utah statutes.
72-10-123.   Sovereignty in space above land and water in state.

Sovereignty in the space above the lands and waters of this state is declared to rest in the state, except where granted to and assumed by the United States pursuant to a constitutional grant from the people of this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

